en: Vegetarian, Suitable for vegetarians
bg: Вегетарианско, Подходящо за вегетарианци
ca: Vegetarià, Adequat per persones vegetarianes
cs: Vegetariánské
da: Vegetarisk, Velegnet for vegetarer
de: Vegetarisch
es: Vegetariano, Producto vegetariano, Apto para vegetarianos, Vegetarian
fi: kasvisruoka, vegetaarinen, sopii kasvissyöjille, sopii kasvisruokavalioon
fr: Végétarien, Convient aux végétariens, Adapté au régime végétarien
he: צמחוני, מתאים לצמחונים
hr: Vegetarijanski
hu: Vegetáriánus
it: Vegetariano
lt: Vegetariškas, Tinkamas vegetarams
nb: Vegetarisk, Egnet for vegetarianere
nl: Vegetarisch
pl: Wegetariańskie, przyjazne wegetarianom
pt: Vegetariano, adequado a vegetarianos, adequado para vegetarianos, adequado a uma dieta vegetariana
ro: Vegetarian
sv: Vegetarisk, Passar för vegetarianer, Lämplig för vegetarianer
th: มังสวิรัติ
tr: Vejetaryen
zh: 素食

en: Vegan, Suitable for vegans, Suitable for vegetarians and vegans, vegetal, from plants, derived from plants, vegetal origin, not from animals, not derived from animals, non-animal, from vegetal source, free from animal products, vegetable source
an: vegano
bg: Веган
ca: Vegà, Adequat per persones veganes
cs: Veganské
da: Vegansk, Velegnet til veganere, vegetabilsk, velegnet til veganere og vegetarer
de: Vegan
es: Vegano, Producto vegano, Vegan, Apto para veganos y vegetarianos
fi: vegaaninen, sopii vegaaneille, kasviperäinen, Sopii vegaaniruokavalioon
fr: Végétalien, Végan, végétal, végétaux, de plantes, dérivé de plante, dérivés de plante, dérivée de plante, dérivées de plante, origine végétale, non-animal
gl: vegano
he: טבעוני, מתאים לטבעונים
hr: vegan
hu: Vegán
it: Vegano, Vegan
lt: Veganiškas, Tinkamas veganams, Tinkama vegetarams ir veganams
nb: Vegan, Vegansk
nl: Veganistisch, plantaardig, niet dierlijk
pl: Wegańskie, przyjazne weganom, wegański, wegańska
pt: Vegano, produto vegano, vegan, adequado para veganos, adequado a veganos, adequado a uma dieta vegan, adequado a uma dieta vegana, adequado a vegetarianos e veganos, odpowiedni dla wegan
sq: vegan
sv: Vegansk, Passar för veganer, vegetabilisk, vegetabiliskt, vegetabiliskt ursprung, veganska, 100% vegansk
th: สูตรเจ
tr: Vegan
zh: 纯素

en: Non-vegan, not vegan, not suitable for vegans, from animal origin, derived from animals, from animal source
fr: Non-végétalien, non-végan, non-végétal, ne convient pas aux végétaliens, ne convient pas aux végans, d'origine animale, de source animale
hr: nije vegansko
pl: Niewegańskie, niewegański
pt: Não-vegan, não vegan, não adequado a vegans, não adequado a uma dieta vegan
sv: icke-vegansk, icke-veganskt, icke-veganska, animalisk, animaliskt, animaliska

en: EcoVeg
xx: EcoVeg

en: I'm Vegan
xx: I'm Vegan, I'M VEGAN

en: NZ Vegetarian Society, NZVS
xx: NZ Vegetarian Society, NZVS

en: NZ Vegetarian Society Vegan Certification, NZVS Vegan Certification
xx: NZ Vegetarian Society Vegan Certification, NZVS Vegan Certification

da: dansk vegetarisk forening, dvf
xx: dansk vegetarisk forening, dvf

da: dansk vegetarisk forening vegetarisk, dvf vegetarisk
xx: dansk vegetarisk forening vegetarian, dvf vegetarian

da: dansk vegetarisk forening vegansk, dvf vegansk
xx: dansk vegetarisk forening vegan, dvf vegan

it: ICEA
xx: ICEA

it: ICEA Biologico
xx: ICEA Biologico

it: ICEA Vegan, ICEA Certified Vegan
xx: ICEA Vegan, ICEA Certified Vegan

it: ICEA Bio Vegan
xx: ICEA Bio Vegan

it: ICEA Vegetariano, ICEA Certified Vegetariano
xx: ICEA Vegetariano, ICEA Certified Vegetariano

it: ICEA Bio Vegetariano
xx: ICEA Bio Vegetariano

it: Vegan Cert, Vegan Product Certification
xx: Vegan Cert, Vegan Product Certification

en: Vegetarian Society Approved
xx: Vegetarian Society Approved

en: Vegetarian Society Approved Vegan
xx: Vegetarian Society Approved Vegan

it: Qualità Vegetariana Vegan
xx: Qualità Vegetariana Vegan